New York, session 2025-2026, A1139.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 1 of section 225 of the public service law, as 2 added by chapter 83 of the laws of 1995, is amended to read as follows: 3 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section, and by federal law 4 and regulation, the rates charged by a cable television company shall be 5 those specified in the franchise which may establish, or provide for the 6 establishment of reasonable classifications of service and categories of 7 subscribers, or charge different rates for differing services or for 8 subscribers in different categories. No cable television company shall 9 charge a different rate for the same service to different subscribers. 10 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD03482-01-5